Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 4 Creation, Validity, Modification, and Termination of Trust

386B.4-010.
Methods of creating trust.

A trust may be created by:

Transfer of property to another person as trustee during the settlor’s lifetime or by will or other disposition taking effect on the settlor’s death;

Declaration by the owner of property that the owner holds identifiable property as trustee; or

Exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a trustee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 23, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-020.
Requirements for creation.

A trust is created only if:

The settlor has capacity to create a trust;

The settlor indicates an intention to create the trust;

The trust has a definite beneficiary or is:

A charitable trust;

A trust for the care of an animal under KRS

386B.4-080

; or

A trust for a noncharitable purpose under KRS

386B.4-090

;

The trustee has duties to perform; and

The same person is not the sole trustee and sole beneficiary.

A power in a trustee to select a beneficiary from an indefinite class is valid. If the power is not exercised within a reasonable time, the power fails and the property subject to the power passes to the persons who would have taken the property had the power not been conferred.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 24, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-030.
Trusts created in other jurisdictions.

A trust not created by will is validly created if its creation complies with the law of the jurisdiction in which the trust instrument was executed, or the law of the jurisdiction in which, at the time of creation:

The settlor was domiciled, had a place of abode, or was a national;

A trustee was domiciled or had a place of business; or

Any trust property was located.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 25, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-040.
Trust purposes.

A trust may be created only to the extent its purposes are lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve. A trust and its terms shall be for the benefit of its beneficiaries.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 26, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-050.
Charitable purposes — Enforcement.

A charitable trust may be created for the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, governmental or municipal purposes, or other purposes the achievement of which is beneficial to the community.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

381.260

, if the terms of a charitable trust do not indicate a particular charitable purpose or beneficiary, the court may select one (1) or more charitable purposes or beneficiaries. The selection shall be consistent with the settlor’s intention to the extent it can be ascertained.

The settlor of a charitable trust, among others, may maintain a proceeding to enforce the trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 27, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-060.
Creation of trust induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

A trust is void to the extent its creation was induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 28, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-070.
Evidence of oral trust.

Except as required by a statute other than those in this chapter, a trust need not be evidenced by a trust instrument, but the creation of an oral trust and its terms may be established only by clear and convincing evidence.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 29, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-080.
Trust for care of animal.

A trust may be created to provide for the care of an animal alive during the settlor’s lifetime. The trust terminates on the death of the animal or, if the trust was created to provide for the care of more than one (1) animal alive during the settlor’s lifetime, on the death of the last surviving animal.

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person appointed in the terms of the trust or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the court. A person having an interest in the welfare of the animal may request the court to appoint a person to enforce the trust or to remove a person appointed.

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use shall be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor’s successors in interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 30, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-090.
Noncharitable trust without ascertainable beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

386B.4-080

, KRS

367.952

regarding perpetual care and maintenance trusts for cemeteries, or by another statute, the following rules apply:

A trust may be created for a noncharitable purpose without a definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary or for a noncharitable but otherwise valid purpose to be selected by the trustee;

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person appointed in the terms of the trust or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the District Court; and

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use shall be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor’s successors in interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 31, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-100.
Modification or termination of trust — Proceedings for approval or disapproval.

In addition to the methods of termination prescribed by KRS

386B.4-110

,

386B.4-120

,

386B.4-130

, and

386B.4-140

, a trust terminates to the extent the trust is revoked or expires pursuant to its terms, no purpose of the trust remains to be achieved, or the purposes of the trust have become unlawful, contrary to public policy, or impossible to achieve.

A proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under KRS

386B.4-110

,

386B.4-120

,

386B.4-130

,

386B.4-140

,

386B.4-150

, and

386B.4-160

, or trust combination or division under KRS

386B.4-170

, may be commenced by a trustee or beneficiary, and a proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under KRS

386B.4-110

may be commenced by the settlor. The settlor of a charitable trust may maintain a proceeding to modify the trust under KRS

386B.4-130

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 32, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-110.
Modification or termination of noncharitable irrevocable trust by consent.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, a noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified or terminated upon consent of the settlor and all beneficiaries, without court approval, even if the modification or termination is inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust. A settlor’s power to consent to a trust’s modification or termination may be exercised:

By an agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the power of attorney and not prohibited by the terms of the trust;

By the settlor’s conservator with the approval of the court supervising the conservatorship if an agent is not so authorized and the conservator is not prohibited by the terms of the trust; or

By the settlor’s guardian with the approval of the court supervising the guardianship if an agent is not so authorized and a conservator has not been appointed and the guardian is not prohibited by the terms of the trust.

A noncharitable irrevocable trust may be terminated upon consent of all of the beneficiaries if the court concludes that continuance of the trust is not necessary to achieve any material purpose of the trust. A noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified upon consent of all of the beneficiaries if the court concludes that modification is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust.

A spendthrift provision in the terms of the trust is not presumed to constitute a material purpose of the trust.

Upon termination of a trust under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property as agreed by the beneficiaries.

If not all of the beneficiaries consent to a proposed modification or termination of the trust under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the modification or termination may be approved by the court if the court is satisfied that:

If all of the beneficiaries had consented, the trust could have been modified or terminated under this section; and

The interests of a beneficiary who does not consent will be adequately protected.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the following types of trusts:

First-party special needs or supplemental trusts created under KRS

387.855

to

387.910

;

Trusts created under 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p(d)(4)(A);

Trusts created under 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p(d)(4)(C);

Trusts created under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396p(c)(2)(B); and

Third-party special needs or supplemental trusts established by a will, trust, or similar document and created under the common law or any other law of the Commonwealth.

The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 33, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-120.
Modification or termination because of unanticipated circumstances or inability to administer trust effectively.

The court may modify the administrative or dispositive terms of a trust or terminate the trust if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the settlor, modification or termination will further the purposes of the trust. To the extent practicable, the modification shall be made in accordance with the settlor’s probable intention.

The court may modify the administrative terms of a trust if continuation of the trust on its existing terms would be impracticable or wasteful or impair the trust’s administration.

Upon termination of a trust under this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property in a manner consistent with the purposes of the trust.

The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 34, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-130.
Cy pres.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, if a particular charitable purpose becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful:

The trust shall not fail, in whole or in part;

The trust property shall not revert to the settlor or the settlor’s successors in interest; and

The court may apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust by directing that the trust property be applied or distributed, in whole or in part, in a manner consistent with the settlor’s charitable purposes.

A provision in the terms of a charitable trust that would result in distribution of the trust property to a noncharitable beneficiary prevails over the power of the court under subsection (1) of this section to apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust only if, when the provision takes effect:

The trust property is to revert to the settlor and the settlor is still living; or

Fewer than twenty-one (21) years have elapsed since the date of the trust’s creation.

The Circuit Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over actions to identify a charitable beneficiary of a trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 35, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-140.
Modification or termination of uneconomic trust.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the trustee of a trust consisting of trust property or a personal representative holding or controlling an amount directed by will to be held in trust, having a total value less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may terminate the trust if the trustee concludes that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.

The court may modify or terminate a trust or remove the trustee and appoint a different trustee if it determines that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.

Upon termination of a trust under this section, the trustee or personal representative shall distribute the trust property in a manner consistent with the purposes of the trust.

This section does not apply to an easement for conservation or preservation.

The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 36, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-150.
Reformation to correct mistakes.

The court may reform the terms of a trust, even if unambiguous, to conform the terms to the settlor’s intention if it is proved by clear and convincing evidence what the settlor’s intention was and that the terms of the trust were affected by a mistake of fact or law, whether in expression or inducement.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 37, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-160.
Modification to achieve settlor’s tax objectives.

To achieve the settlor’s tax objectives, the court may modify the terms of a trust in a manner that is not contrary to the settlor’s probable intention. The court may provide that the modification has retroactive effect. The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 38, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.4-170.
Combination and division of trusts.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, a trustee may combine two (2) or more trusts into a single trust or divide a trust into two (2) or more separate trusts, if the result does not impair rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect achievement of the purposes of the trust.

Any division of a trust shall be made on a fractional basis, and may be funded by a non-pro rata distribution of assets to the separate trusts.

The District Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 39, effective July 15, 2014.